Illinois, session 104th, SB1944.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,200,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education for the purpose of 7new principal mentoring. 8    Section 10. The amount of $8,000,000, or so much of that 9amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 10Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education for the purpose of 11new educator mentoring and coaching. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.